Maine, session 132, LD48.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §111, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 619, §1 and affected
by §2, is further amended to read:
1-A. Code. "Code" means the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and
amendments to that Code as of December 31, 2023 2024.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2024 and to any prior tax year as specifically provided by the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986 and amendments to that Code as of December 31, 2024.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR0156(03)